Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1415.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 2, article 3.2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-321.03, to read: START_STATUTE20-321.03. Salaried employee adjusters; licensure; exemption; renewability: definition A. Notwithstanding sections 20-321.01 and 20-321.02, a salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general agent is eligible to be licensed in this state as an adjuster without taking this state's adjuster examination if all of the following apply: 1. The salaried employee is a resident of this state and before January 1, 2026 held an active designated home state adjuster license in another state. 2. The salaried employee who holds an active designated home state adjuster license from another state is currently in good standing in the other state. 3. The salaried employee submits an application for licensure by virtue of holding an active designated home state adjuster license on a form prescribed by the director and submits the fee and the fingerprints as required by section 20-285, subsection E on or before June 30, 2027. 4. The salaried employee qualified for a designated home state adjuster license in the other state by passing a state-approved examination. B. A person who is licensed as an adjuster pursuant to this section shall only adjust claims as a salaried employee of an insurer or managing general agent and may not: 1. Adjust claims on behalf of an insured. 2. Adjust claims on behalf of an insurer in a capacity other than as a salaried employee of the insurer or a managing general agent. C. An adjuster license that is issued pursuant to this section is valid and renewable only for as long as and until the time the person ceases to adjust claims as a salaried employee of the licensed insurer or managing general agent.  A person who wishes to act as or claim to be an adjuster shall apply for and obtain a license as an adjuster. D. For the purposes of this section, "salaried employee" has the same meaning prescribed in section 20-321, paragraph 1, subdivision (b), item (ii). END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 2, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 2, 2026.